Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1052.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fireproofing Licensing Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accredited educational and training program." A program that is:(1) designed to provide education and training on the application of fire-resistant materials; and(2) approved and accredited by the board."Board." The Fireproofing Applicator Licensing Board 123456789101112131415161718 established under section 3."Certificate." A certificate of licensure issued by the board indicating that the individual named in the certificate of licensure is a fire-resistant material applicator."Fire-resistant material." A cementitious or fibrous material that is sprayed onto a surface to provide fire-resistant protection of the substrate of the surface."Fire-resistant material applicator." An individual who applies fire-resistant materials.Section 3. Fireproofing Applicator Licensing Board.(a) Establishment.--The Fireproofing Applicator Licensing Board is established.(b) Composition.--The board shall consist of the following voting members:(1) The Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs or a designee.(2) The State Fire Commissioner or a designee.(3) Five individuals appointed by the Governor. The following apply:(i) Each of the five individuals shall be a resident of this Commonwealth.(ii) Two of the five individuals shall be fire-resistant material applicators with at least 10 years of practical experience and who are wage earners.(iii) Two of the five individuals shall be fire-resistant material applicators with at least 10 years of practical experience.(iv) One of the five individuals shall be a representative of the public.(c) Terms.--A member of the board described under subsection 20250HB1052PN1141 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b)(3) shall be appointed to a term of three years. The member shall not be eligible for appointment to more than two consecutive full terms.(d) Oath.--Each member of the board shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office.(e) Attendance.--A member of the board appointed under subsection (b)(3) who fails to attend three consecutive meetings shall forfeit membership on the board, unless the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs, upon written request from the member, finds that the member should be excused from a meeting because of illness or the death of an immediate family member.(f) Quorum.--A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum to conduct official business.(g) Organization and meetings.--(1) An organizational meeting of the board shall be held annually, at which time the board shall elect from its membership a president, vice president and secretary, who shall serve for one year or until the board elects a successor.(2) The board shall meet at least four times per year and at other times as the board, in consultation with the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs, deems desirable. Other meetings of the board may be called in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board.(3) The board shall give adequate public notice of the date, time and place of meetings.(h) Vacancy in office.--If a vacancy in the office of president, vice president or secretary of the board occurs, the 20250HB1052PN1141 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 remaining members of the board shall fill the vacancy by election.(i) Expenses.--Each member of the board shall be paid reasonable travel, lodging and other necessary expenses and per diem compensation at the rate of $60 for each day of actual service while on board business.Section 4. Powers and duties of board.The board shall:(1) Establish reasonable rules and regulations that are consistent with and necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, including:(i) Standards of professional conduct for fire-resistant material applicators.(ii) Procedures for the issuance and renewal of certificates as the board deems appropriate.(iii) The functions, powers, standards and duties to be followed by hearing examiners under this act.(iv) Fees required under this act.(2) Issue certificates to individuals who are eligible under section 5(a).(3) Establish standards for continuing education reflecting acceptable national standards in the application and use of fire-resistant materials.(4) Approve accredited educational and training programs.(5) Administer and enforce the laws of this Commonwealth relating to fire-resistant material application, including:(i) The commencement of appropriate proceedings or other actions for unauthorized and unlawful practice and for other violations of this act, including the 20250HB1052PN1141 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 initiation of proceedings for injunctive relief or criminal prosecution. Proceedings for injunctive relief or criminal prosecution shall be in accordance with the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(ii) The commencement of disciplinary action as described in this act.(6) Appoint, with the approval of the Governor, hearing examiners as necessary to conduct hearings under this act.(7) Keep records of the proceedings of the board.(8) Keep records relating to applications, which shall include:(i) The name, age and last known address of each applicant for licensure.(ii) Information concerning each applicant's education, experience and other qualifications.(iii) Other information as the board deems appropriate.(9) Maintain and regularly update a roster showing the name, license number and business address of each fire-resistant material applicator under this act. The board shall post the roster on the publicly accessible Internet website of the board.(10) Maintain records relating to each fire-resistant material applicator.(11) Submit, at the end of each fiscal year, an annual report of the activities and transactions of the board during the preceding fiscal year to the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs.(12) Within 15 days after the Governor has submitted the 20250HB1052PN1141 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal year to the General Assembly, submit a proposed budget request for the operation of the board for the ensuing fiscal year to:(i) The Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(13) Submit an annual report, which contains a description of the types of complaints received by the board, the status of cases, board actions and the length of time from the initial complaint to final board resolution, to:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives.(14) Determine whether the fees, fines and civil penalties imposed under this act are sufficient to cover expenditures and take steps to ensure that projected revenues will meet or exceed projected expenditures.Section 5. Applicants.(a) Eligibility.--An individual who is of good character, who is a legal resident of this Commonwealth and who has 20250HB1052PN1141 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 completed an accredited educational and training program may apply for a certificate under this act.(b) Verification.--Each applicant for a certificate shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant has completed an accredited educational and training program.Section 6. Issuance and renewal of certificates.(a) Issuance.--Upon approval of an application for a certificate, the board shall issue the certificate conditional on payment of a fee set by the board.(b) Contents.--Each certificate shall contain the name of the individual to whom the certificate was issued and a license number.(c) Term.--(1) A certificate shall be valid for two years.(2) A certificate shall expire on the day prescribed by the board.(d) Renewal.--A fire-resistant material applicator may renew a certificate after review by the board to ensure that the applicant for renewal remains in compliance with this act.(e) Duplicates.--(1) The board shall issue a duplicate certificate to replace one that has been lost, destroyed or mutilated, upon payment of a fee as required by the board.(2) The board may require a fire-resistant material applicator requesting a duplicate certificate to furnish documentation satisfactory to the board relating to the loss, destruction or mutilation of the original certificate.(f) Nontransferability.--A certificate shall not be transferable to another individual.(g) Board authority.--The board may, in its discretion, 20250HB1052PN1141 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issue a certificate to an applicant denied licensure upon presentation of suitable evidence of reform.Section 7. Prohibition.An individual may not engage or offer to engage in the practice of fire-resistant material application in this Commonwealth unless the individual holds a currently valid certificate.Section 8. Disciplinary proceedings.(a) Board action for inappropriate acts.--The board may refuse to issue a certificate to an applicant, revoke or suspend a certificate, censure a fire-resistant material applicator, issue a letter of reprimand, restrict a fire-resistant material applicator or attach conditions to a certificate for any of the following acts:(1) Bribery, fraud, misstatement or misrepresentation of fact by an applicant in connection with the application for a certificate.(2) Engaging in the application of fire-resistant materials in this Commonwealth in violation of:(i) any provision of this act; or(ii) the rules and regulations adopted or promulgated in accordance with this act.(3) Bribery, fraud, deceit, recklessness, gross negligence or incompetence in the practice of fire-resistant material application.(b) Powers of board.--In a disciplinary proceeding brought in accordance with this act, the board shall have the power to administer oaths, summon witnesses and compel the production of documents in accordance with law. If a person fails to appear or produce documents in accordance with the board's order, the 20250HB1052PN1141 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board may take appropriate action in accordance with the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, to enforce compliance.Section 9. Penalties.(a) Fines.--A person who engages in the application of fire-resistant materials in violation of this act shall:(1) For a first offense, be guilty of a summary offense and, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $500.(2) For a second or subsequent offense, be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $2,000 but not more than $5,000.(b) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board may, by majority vote, levy a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 on a fire-resistant material applicator who violates any provision of this act or on a person who practices fire-resistant material application without being properly licensed to do so under this act. The board may levy the civil penalty only after affording the accused party the opportunity for a hearing, in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(c) Remedy not exclusive.--The right of the board to take an action under section 8(a) shall be in addition to the penalties specified under this section.(d) Deposit.--All fines and civil penalties imposed in accordance with this section shall be deposited into the Professional Licensure Augmentation Account.Section 10. Complaint procedure and hearings.(a) Charges.--(1) A person may refer charges against a fire-resistant 20250HB1052PN1141 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 material applicator by submitting a written statement of charges, sworn to by the complainant, to the board.(2) The board may, on its own motion, investigate the conduct of an applicant or a fire-resistant material applicator and shall, in appropriate cases, file a written statement of charges.(b) Representation.--An applicant or fire-resistant material applicator charged shall be entitled to be represented by counsel at a hearing under subsection (c).(c) Hearings.--(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a hearing under this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(2) A hearing under this subsection may be held by the board, any member of the board or any hearing examiner or other person authorized by the board.(3) The date, time and place of a hearing under this subsection shall be fixed by the board or authorized hearing examiner.(4) An individual authorized to conduct a hearing under this subsection may administer oaths and conduct investigations.(5) When a matter is referred to an authorized hearing examiner or other person for a hearing under this subsection, the hearing officer or other person shall, following the completion of the testimony in the hearing and as soon as practicable, file a report with the board specifying findings of fact and recommendations. Upon review of the record, the board may, by majority vote:20250HB1052PN1141 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) adopt the findings and recommendations in the report; or(ii) with or without additional testimony:(A) return the matter to the hearing officer or other person for further consideration as the board deems necessary; or(B) make additional or other findings of fact on the basis of all the legally probative evidence in the record and enter its conclusions of law and order in accordance with the requirements for the issuance of an adjudication under 2 Pa.C.S.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1052PN1141 - 11 - 12345678910111213